Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 4. Limitations on Agreements and Practices

§ 40-14-235.
Scope; violations of federal Military Lending Act.

This part applies to consumer credit sales and consumer leases.

The administrator may seek an appropriate remedy, penalty, action or license revocation or suspension as provided in articles 5 and 6 of this chapter against a person licensed under this act for a violation of 10 U.S.C. § 987 or any rule promulgated that is authorized by that section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-401; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-401; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

added "; violations of federal Military Lending Act" in the section heading; added the (a) designation; and added (b).

§ 40-14-236.
Use of multiple agreements.

A seller may not use multiple agreements with intent to obtain a higher credit service charge than would otherwise be permitted by this article or to avoid disclosure of an annual percentage rate pursuant to the laws relating to disclosure and advertising. The excess amount of credit service charge provided for in agreements in violation of this section is an excess charge for the purposes of the provisions on the effect of violations on rights of parties (W.S.

40-14-521

) and the provisions on civil actions by administrator (W.S.

40-14-613

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-402; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-402.

§ 40-14-237.
Certain negotiable instruments prohibited.

In a consumer credit sale or consumer lease the seller or lessor may not take a negotiable instrument other than a check as evidence of the obligation of the buyer or lessee. A holder is not in good faith if he takes a negotiable instrument with notice that it is issued in violation of this section. A holder in due course is not subject to the liabilities set forth in the provisions on the effect of violations on rights of parties (W.S.

40-14-521

) and the provisions on civil actions by administrator (W.S.

40-14-613

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-403; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-403; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to negotiable instruments, see chapter 3 of title 34.1.

This section simply abrogates right of seller to take negotiable document

and assign it to a lender. Stevens v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 577 P.2d 1374,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1978).

Bank may accept negotiable paper as evidence of obligation. —

This section prohibits only a seller or lessor from taking a negotiable instrument as evidence of the obligation created. No mention is made of any other party, and a bank is neither a seller nor a lessor. Rather a bank is a “lender” governed by the provisions of article 3 of the Uniform Consumer Credit Code, and nowhere within that article is there a similar prohibition. Consequently, a bank can accept negotiable paper. Stevens v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 577 P.2d 1374,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1978).

Applied

in

Hinkle v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 538 F.2d 295, 1976 U.S. App. LEXIS 8089 (10th Cir. 1976).

Stated

in

Stevens v. Rock Springs Nat'l Bank, 497 F.2d 307, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 8514 (10th Cir. 1974).

§ 40-14-238.
When assignee not subject to defenses.

With respect to a consumer credit sale or consumer lease an agreement by the buyer or lessee not to assert against an assignee a claim or defense arising out of the sale or lease is enforceable only by an assignee not related to the seller or lessor who acquires the buyer’s or lessee’s contract in good faith and for value, who gives the buyer or lessee notice of the assignment as provided in this section and who, within forty-five (45) days after the mailing of the notice of assignment, receives no written notice of the facts giving rise to the buyer’s or lessee’s claim or defense. This agreement is enforceable only with respect to claims or defenses which have arisen before the end of the forty-five (45) day period after notice was mailed. The notice of assignment shall be in writing and addressed to the buyer or lessee at his address as stated in the contract, identify the contract, describe the goods or services, state the names of the seller or lessor and buyer or lessee, the name and address of the assignee, the amount payable by the buyer or lessee and the number, amounts and due dates of the installments, and contain a conspicuous notice to the buyer or lessee that he has forty-five (45) days within which to notify the assignee in writing of any complaints, claims or defenses he may have against the seller or lessor and that if written notification of the complaints, claims or defenses is not received by the assignee within the forty-five (45) day period, the assignee will have the right to enforce the contract free of any claims or defenses the buyer or lessee may have against the seller or lessor which have arisen before the end of the forty-five (45) day period after notice was mailed.

An assignee does not acquire a buyer’s or lessee’s contract in good faith within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section if the assignee has knowledge or, from his course of dealing with the seller or lessor or his records, notice of substantial complaints by other buyers or lessees of the seller’s or lessor’s failure or refusal to perform his contracts with them and of the seller’s or lessor’s failure to remedy his defaults within a reasonable time after the assignee notifies him of the complaints.

To the extent that under this section an assignee is subject to claims or defenses of the buyer or lessee against the seller or lessor, the assignee’s liability under this section may not exceed the amount owing to the assignee at the time the claim or defense is asserted against the assignee and rights of the buyer or lessee under this section can only be asserted as a matter of defense to or setoff against a claim by the assignee.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-404; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-404; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

§ 40-14-239.
Balloon payments.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, other than one pursuant to a revolving charge account, if any scheduled payment is more than twice as large as the average of earlier scheduled payments, the buyer has the right to refinance the amount of that payment at the time it is due if the seller is still offering that type of credit and the buyer is creditworthy. Credit terms shall be as favorable as those offered to the general public by the seller for the same type of sale at the time a request for refinancing is approved. These provisions do not apply to the extent that the payment schedule is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the buyer.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-405; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-405; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1989, ch. 77, § 1.

§ 40-14-240.
Restriction on liability in consumer lease.

The obligation of a lessee upon expiration of a consumer lease may not exceed twice the average payment allocable to a monthly period under the lease. This limitation does not apply to charges for damages to the leased property or for other default.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-406; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-406; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

§ 40-14-241.
Security in sales or leases.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, a seller may take a security interest in the property sold. In addition, a seller may take a security interest in goods upon which services are performed or in which goods sold are installed or to which they are annexed, or in land to which the goods are affixed or which is maintained, repaired or improved as a result of the sale of the goods or services, if in the case of a security interest in land the debt secured is one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more, or, in the case of a security interest in goods the debt secured is three hundred dollars ($300.00) or more. Except as provided with respect to cross-collateral (W.S.

40-14-242

), a seller may not otherwise take a security interest in property of the buyer to secure the debt arising from a consumer credit sale.

With respect to a consumer lease a lessor shall not take a security interest in property of the lessee to secure the debt arising from the lease. This subsection does not apply to a security deposit for a consumer lease.

A security interest taken in violation of this section is void.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-407; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-407; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to secured transactions under Uniform Commercial Code, see article 9 of title 34.1.

§ 40-14-242.
Cross-collateral.

In addition to contracting for a security interest pursuant to the provisions on security in sales or leases (W.S.

40-14-241

), a seller in a consumer credit sale may secure the debt arising from the sale by contracting for a security interest in other property if as a result of a prior sale the seller has an existing security interest in the other property. The seller may also contract for a security interest in the property sold in the subsequent sale as security for the previous debt.

If the seller contracts for a security interest in other property pursuant to this section, the rate of credit service charge thereafter on the aggregate unpaid balances so secured may not exceed that permitted if the balances so secured were consolidated pursuant to the provisions on consolidation involving a refinancing (W.S. 40-14-217(a)(i)). The seller has a reasonable time after so contracting to make any adjustments required by this section. “Seller” in this section does not include an assignee not related to the original seller.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-408; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-408.

§ 40-14-243.
Debt secured by cross-collateral.

If debts arising from two (2) or more consumer credit sales, other than sales pursuant to a revolving charge account, are secured by cross-collateral (W.S.

40-14-242

) or consolidated into one (1) debt payable on a single schedule of payments, and the debt is secured by security interests taken with respect to one (1) or more of the sales, payments received by the seller after the taking of the cross-collateral or the consolidation are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been first applied to the payment of the debts arising from the sales first made. To the extent debts are paid according to this section, security interests in items of property terminate as the debts originally incurred with respect to each item are paid.

Payments received by the seller upon a revolving charge account are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been applied first to the payment of credit service charges in the order of their entry to the account and then to the payment of debts in the order in which the entries to the account showing the debts were made.

If the debts consolidated arose from two (2) or more sales made on the same day, payments received by the seller are deemed, for the purpose of determining the amount of the debt secured by the various security interests, to have been applied first to the payment of the smallest debt.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-409; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-409; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

§ 40-14-244.
No assignment of earnings.

A seller or lessor may not take an assignment of earnings of the buyer or lessee for payment or as security for payment of a debt arising out of a consumer credit sale or a consumer lease. An assignment of earnings in violation of this section is unenforceable by the assignee of the earnings and revocable by the buyer or lessee. This section does not prohibit an employee from authorizing deductions from his earnings if the authorization is revocable.

Notwithstanding the foregoing prohibition, a seller or lessor may take an assignment of commissions or accounts receivable payable to the buyer or lessee for services rendered for payment or as security for payment of a debt arising out of a consumer lease.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-410; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-410.

§ 40-14-245.
Referral sales.

With respect to a consumer credit sale or consumer lease the seller or lessor may not give or offer to give a rebate or discount or otherwise pay or offer to pay value to the buyer or lessee as an inducement for a sale or lease in consideration of his giving to the seller or lessor the names of prospective purchasers or lessees, or otherwise aiding the seller or lessor in making a sale or lease to another person, if the earning of the rebate, discount or other value is contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time the buyer or lessee agrees to buy or lease. If a buyer or lessee is induced by a violation of this section to enter into a consumer credit sale or consumer lease, the agreement is unenforceable by the seller or lessor and the buyer or lessee, at his option, may rescind the agreement or retain the goods delivered and the benefit of any services performed, without any obligation to pay for them.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-411; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-411.

§ 40-14-246.
Notice of assignment.

The buyer or lessee is authorized to pay the original seller or lessor until the buyer or lessee receives notification of assignment of the rights to payment pursuant to a consumer credit sale or consumer lease and that payment is to be made to the assignee. A notification which does not reasonably identify the rights assigned is ineffective. If requested by the buyer or lessee, the assignee must seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made and unless he does so the buyer or lessee may pay the seller or lessor.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-412; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-412.

§ 40-14-247.
Attorney's fees.

With respect to a consumer credit sale or consumer lease the agreement may provide for the payment by the buyer or lessee of reasonable attorney’s fees after default and referral to an attorney not a salaried employee of the seller, or of the lessor or his assignee. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-413; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-413.

§ 40-14-248.
Limitation on default charges.

Except for reasonable expenses incurred in realizing on a security interest, the agreement with respect to a consumer credit sale may not provide for any charges as a result of default by the buyer other than those authorized by this act. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-414; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-114.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Applied

in

Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Dec. 19, 2011).

§ 40-14-249.
Authorization to confess judgment prohibited.

A buyer or lessee may not authorize any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of a consumer credit sale or consumer lease. An authorization in violation of this section is void.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-415; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-115.

§ 40-14-250.
Change in terms of revolving charge accounts.

If a seller makes a change in the terms of a revolving charge account without complying with this section any additional cost or charge to the buyer resulting from the change is an excess charge and subject to the remedies available to debtors (W.S.

40-14-521

) and to the administrator (W.S.

40-14-613

).

A seller may change the terms of the revolving charge account whether or not the change is authorized by prior agreement. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the seller shall give to the buyer written notice of any change at least three (3) times, with the first notice at least six (6) months before the effective date of the change.

The notice specified in subsection (b) of this section is not required if notice of any proposed change in the terms of a revolving charge account is given to the customer at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of such change or thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of the billing cycle within which such change will become effective, whichever is the earlier date, and if:

The buyer after receiving notice of the change agrees in writing to the change;

The buyer elects to pay an amount designated on a billing statement as including a new charge for a benefit offered to the buyer when the benefit and charge constitute the change in terms and when the billing statement also states the amount payable if the new charge is excluded;

The change involves no significant cost to the buyer;

The buyer has previously consented in writing to the kind of change made and notice of the change is given to the buyer in two (2) billing cycles prior to the effective date of the change; or

The change applies only to purchases made or obligations incurred after a date specified in a notice of the change given in two (2) billing cycles prior to the effective date of the change.

The notice provided for in this section is given to the buyer when mailed to him at the address used by the seller for sending periodic billing statements.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-416; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-116.